Washington statutes.
RCW 41.14.100

Qualifications of applicants for position—Law enforcement agencies.

An applicant for a position of any kind under civil service under the provisions of this chapter, must be a citizen of the United States, a lawful permanent resident, or a deferred action for childhood arrivals recipient. An applicant for a position of any kind under civil service under the provisions of this chapter must be able to speak, read, and write the English language.

An application for a position with a law enforcement agency may be rejected if the law enforcement agency deems that it does not have the resources to conduct the background investigation required pursuant to chapter 43.101 RCW. Resources means materials, funding, and staff time. Nothing in this section impairs an applicant's rights under state antidiscrimination laws.

[ 2024 c 330 s 7; 2018 c 32 s 3; 1963 c 95 s 3; 1959 c 1 s 10 (Initiative Measure No. 23, approved November 4, 1958).]